District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-205.14

Determination of GPA need standard.

Repealed.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 514, 29 DCR 1060
March 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 701(h), 44 DCR 7378
1981 Ed., § 3-205.14.
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 2(h) of General Public Assistance Program Termination Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-21, September 23, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 5760).
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 2001(b) of Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Temporary Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-59, March 20, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2094).
Application of Law 12-60: Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-60 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.